Maine, session 132, LD77.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10206, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Fishing license revenues. For every fishing license fee collected pursuant to
sections 11109, 11109-A and 12501, the department shall deposit $6.00 into the Inland
Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Fund established in section 10268 and $1 into
the Boat Launch Facilities Fund established in section 10261.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §10268 is enacted to read:
§10268. Inland Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Fund
1. Fund established. The Inland Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Fund,
referred to in this section as "the fund," is established through the Office of the State
Controller as a nonlapsing fund under the jurisdiction of the fisheries and hatcheries
division within the department, referred to in this section as "the division." The department
shall use money in the fund on an annual basis for the conservation and enhancement of
inland freshwater fisheries resources in this State.
2. Fund sources. Six dollars from the sale of resident, nonresident, combination and
super pack fishing licenses must be deposited into the fund. The division may apply for
and accept any appropriation, grant, gift or service made available from any public or
private source consistent with the purpose of this section and shall deposit any such money
into the fund. The fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and
accounts.
3. Uses of fund. The fund must be used according to this subsection.
A. Sixty-five percent of the annual license revenue deposited into the fund must be
allocated to the conservation, research and management of freshwater fish species
native to the State.
B. Thirty-five percent of the annual license revenue deposited into the fund must be
allocated to the enhancement and management of inland freshwater recreational
fisheries in this State.
C. Any amount in the fund that is not expended at the end of a fiscal year does not lapse
but must be carried forward.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶D, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015, c.
494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
D. A resident combination hunting and fishing license is $43 $50.00 and permits
hunting of all legal species, subject to the permit requirements in subchapter 3.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶E, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015, c.
494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
E. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $50.00 and
permits hunting of all legal species, subject to the permit requirements in subchapter 3.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶J, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015, c.
494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
J. A nonresident combination hunting and fishing license is $150 $157.00.
Page 1 - 132LR0251(01)

Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§7, ¶B, as amended by PL 2015, c. 245, §3, is
further amended to read:
B. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $50.00;
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §11109-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 49, §2 and
affected by §3, is further amended to read:
5. Fee. The fee for a super pack license is $207 $214.00 for residents and $182 $189.00
for a person holding 2 or more lifetime licenses.
Sec. 8. 12 MRSA §12501, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2023, c. 228, §§11 and 12,
is further amended to read:
6. Schedule of fees. The fees for fishing licenses are as follows.
A. A resident fishing license is $25 $32.00.
B. A resident combination hunting and fishing license is $43 $50.00.
C. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $50.00.
E. A 3-day fishing license for a resident or nonresident, valid for the 72-hour period
specified on the license, is $23 $30.00.
F. A nonresident 7-day fishing license, valid for 7 days from date indicated on license,
is $43 $50.00.
G. A nonresident 15-day fishing license, valid for 15 days from date indicated on
license, is $47 $54.00.
H. A nonresident season fishing license for persons 16 years of age or older is $64
$71.00.
J. A one-day fishing license for a resident or nonresident, valid for the 24-hour period
indicated on license, is $11 $18.00.